th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์ > ที่ตั้งคอมพิวเตอร์: ขาตั้งและที่วางจอมอนิเตอร์; ขาตั้งเคสคอมพิวเตอร์; แผ่นระบายความร้อนแล็ปท็อป; ขาตั้งแล็ปท็อป; อุปกรณ์แปลงโต๊ะเป็นโต๊ะยืนทำงาน
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни аксесоари > Основи за повдигане на компютри и стойки: Стойки за компютърен монитор; Стойки за компютърна кутия; Охлаждащи подложки за лаптоп; Стойки за лаптоп; Конвертируеми стойки за бюро
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Accessoires pour ordinateurs > Supports pour ordinateurs: Supports et rehausseurs pour moniteur d’ordinateur; Supports pour tour d’ordinateur; Refroidisseurs pour ordinateur portable; Supports pour ordinateur portable; Convertisseurs de bureau assis‑debout
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 라이저/스탠드: 컴퓨터 모니터 스탠드 및 라이저; 컴퓨터 타워 스탠드; 노트북 쿨링 패드; 노트북 스탠드; 스탠딩 데스크 컨버터
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Accesorios informáticos > Bases y elevadores para computadoras: Soportes y elevadores para monitor de computadora; Soportes para torre de computadora; Almohadillas de enfriamiento para portátil; Soportes para portátil; Convertidores de escritorio de pie
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Acessórios para computadores > Suportes para computador: Suportes e elevadores para monitor de computador; Suportes para gabinete de computador; Bases de resfriamento para notebook; Suportes para notebook; Conversores de mesa para trabalho em pé
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonetarvikkeet > Tietokonejalustat ja -telineet: Näytön jalustat ja korokkeet; Tietokonetornin jalustat; Kannettavien jäähdytysalustat; Kannettavien jalustat; Seisomapöytämuuntimet
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện máy tính > Giá đỡ màn hình và kệ máy tính: Giá và nâng cao màn hình máy tính; Giá tháp máy tính; Miếng làm mát laptop; Giá laptop; Bộ chuyển đổi bàn đứng
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Yükselticiler ve Stantları: Bilgisayar Monitör Stantları ve Yükselticileri; Bilgisayar Kule Stantları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Soğutma Pedleri; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Stantları; Ayakta Çalışma Masası Dönüştürücüleri
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datortillbehör > Datorupphöjare: Datorskärmställ och förhöjningar; Datorchassistativ; Kylplattor för bärbara datorer; Stativ för bärbara datorer; Stående skrivbordsomvandlare
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerzubehör > Computer-Monitorständer: Computermonitor-Ständer und -Erhöhungen; Computerturm-Ständer; Laptop-Kühlpads; Laptop-Ständer; Stehschreibtisch-Konverter
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ υπολογιστών > Ανυψωτικά & βάσεις υπολογιστών: Βάσεις και αναβαθμίδες για οθόνες υπολογιστών; Βάσεις για πύργους υπολογιστών; Βάσεις ψύξης για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Βάσεις για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Μετατροπείς γραφείου σε όρθιας εργασίας
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių priedai > Kompiuterių pakylos ir stovai: Kompiuterių monitorių stovai ir pakylos; Kompiuterių korpusų stovai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių aušinimo padėklai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių stovai; Stovimų stalų konverteriai
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-kiegészítők > Számítógép-emelők és -állványok: Számítógépmonitor-állványok és -emelők; Számítógépház-állványok; Laptop-hűtőpárnák; Laptop-állványok; Állítható magasságú asztali állványok
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦配件 > 電腦托架: 電腦螢幕支架與增高架; 電腦主機架; 筆電散熱墊; 筆電支架; 站立式桌面轉換器
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机配件 > 笔记本/显示器支架和底座: 电脑显示器支架和增高架; 电脑机箱支架; 笔记本电脑散热垫; 笔记本电脑支架; 站立式办公桌转换器
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniška oprema > Računalniški podstavki in stojala: Stojala in podstavki za monitorje; Stojala za računalniške omare; Hladilne podloge za prenosnike; Stojala za prenosnike; Pretvorniki za stoječe mize
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové príslušenstvo > Počítačové podstavce a stojany: Stojany a podstavce monitorov; Stojany počítačových skríň; Chladiace podložky notebookov; Stojany na notebooky; Konvertory na stojacie stoly
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computer – tilbehør > Computerholdere og -standere: Computerskærmstativer og -forhøjere; Computertårnstativer; Kølepuder til bærbare computere; Standere til bærbare computere; Konvertere til hæve-/sænkebord
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Dodatna oprema za računala > Podizači i stalci za računala: Stalci i postolja za monitore računala; Stalci za kućišta računala; Podloge za prijenosna računala s ventilacijom; Stalci za prijenosna računala; Konverteri za stajaći radni stol
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítače – příslušenství > Podstavce a stojany pro počítače: Stojany a podstavce pod monitory; Stojany na počítačové věže; Chladicí podložky pod notebooky; Stojany na notebooky; Nástavce na stůl pro práci ve stoje
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Tilbehør til datamaskiner > Datamaskinstativer: Skjermstativ og forhøyere til dataskjerm; Stativ til datamaskintårn; Kjøleputer til bærbar datamaskin; Stativ til bærbar datamaskin; Ståpult-omformere
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeraccessoires > Computerverhogers en -standaards: Computermonitor standaards en verhogingen; Computerbehuizing standaards; Laptop koelpads; Laptop standaards; Sta-bureau converters
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Akcesoria komputerowe > Podnośniki do monitorów i stoliki na laptopy: Stojaki i podwyższenia do monitorów; Stojaki pod obudowy komputerowe; Podkładki chłodzące do laptopa; Stojaki do laptopa; Nakładki na biurko do pracy stojącej
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC周辺機器 > PCスタンド: コンピューターモニター用スタンド・ライザー; コンピュータータワー用スタンド; ノートパソコン冷却パッド; ノートパソコンスタンド; スタンディングデスクコンバーター
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные аксессуары > Подставки для компьютеров: Подставки и возвышения для компьютерных мониторов; Подставки для компьютерных корпусов; Охлаждающие подставки для ноутбуков; Подставки для ноутбуков; Конвертеры для стоячих рабочих мест
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Accesorii calculatoare > Sisteme de înălțare și suporturi pentru computer: Suporturi și înălțătoare pentru monitoare de calculator; Suporturi pentru unitatea centrală; Suporturi cu răcire pentru laptop; Suporturi pentru laptop; Convertori pentru birou reglabil (standing desk)
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Accessori per computer > Alzate e supporti per computer: Supporti e piedistalli per monitor del computer; Supporti per tower del computer; Pad di raffreddamento del laptop; Supporti per laptop; Convertitori da scrivania in piedi
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Acessórios de computador > Apoios e extensores de computador: Suportes e elevadores para monitor; Suportes para torre de computador; Bases de arrefecimento para portátil; Suportes para portátil; Conversores de secretária ajustável
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Accessories > Computer Risers & Stands: Computer Monitor Stands & Risers; Computer Tower Stands; Laptop Cooling Pads; Laptop Stands; Standing Desk Converters